North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 3. Powers and Duties of Department and Board.

§§ 106-15 through 106-19.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-74, s. 5.

§ 106-20.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 244, s. 1(a).

§ 106-21.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-74, s. 7.

§ 106-21.1.
Feed Advisory Service; fee.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall operate a Feed Advisory Service for the analysis of animal feeds in order to provide a feeding management service to all animal producers in North Carolina. A fee of ten dollars ($10.00) shall accompany each feed sample sent to the Department for testing. A fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) shall accompany each feed sample which is to be tested for the presence of fumonisin.

History.

1979, c. 1026; 1989, c. 544, s. 9; 1991, c. 649, s. 1; 1997-261, s. 21.

§ 106-21.2.
Food Bank information and referral service.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may maintain an information and referral service for persons and organizations that have notified the department of their desire to donate food to a nonprofit organization or a nonprofit corporation.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1188, s. 2; 1997-261, s. 22.

§ 106-22.
Joint duties of Commissioner and Board.

The Commissioner of Agriculture, by and with the consent and advice of the Board of Agriculture shall:

General. — Investigate and promote such subjects relating to the improvement of agriculture, the beneficial use of commercial fertilizers and composts, and for the inducement of immigration and capital as he may think proper; but he is especially charged:

Commercial Fertilizers. — With such supervision of the trade in commercial fertilizers as will best protect the interests of the farmers, and shall report to district attorneys and to the General Assembly information as to the existence or formation of trusts or combinations in fertilizers or fertilizing materials which are or may be offered for sale in this State, whereby the interests of the farmers may be injuriously affected, and shall publish such information in the Bulletin of the Department;

Cattle and Cattle Diseases. — With investigations adapted to promote the improvement of milk and beef cattle, and especially investigations relating to the diseases of cattle and other domestic animals, and shall publish and distribute from time to time information relative to any contagious diseases of stock, and suggest remedies therefor, and shall have power in such cases to quarantine the infected animals and to regulate the transportation of stock in this State, or from one section of it to another, and may cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture in establishing and maintaining cattle districts or quarantine lines, to prevent the infection of cattle from splenic or Spanish fever. Any person willfully violating such regulations shall be liable in a civil action to any person injured, and for any and all damages resulting from such conduct, and shall also be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor;

Honey and Bee Industry. — With investigations adapted to promote the improvement of the honey and bee industry in this State, and especially investigations relating to the diseases of bees, and shall publish and distribute from time to time information relative to such diseases, and such remedies therefor, and shall have power in such cases to quarantine the infected bees and to control or eradicate such infections and to regulate the transportation or importation into North Carolina from any other state or country of bees, honey, hives, or any apiary equipment, or from one section of the State to another, and may cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture in establishing and maintaining quarantine lines or districts. The Commissioner of Agriculture, by and with the consent and advice of the Board of Agriculture, shall have power to make rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this section; and in event of failure to comply with any such rules and regulations, the Commissioner of Agriculture or his duly authorized agent is authorized to confiscate and destroy any infected bees and equipment and any bees and/or used apiary equipment moved in violation of these regulations;

Insect Pests. — With investigations relative to the ravages of insects and with the dissemination of such information as may be deemed essential for their abatement, and making regulations for destruction of such insects. The willful violation of any of such regulations by any person shall be a Class 1 misdemeanor;

New Agricultural Industries. — With investigations and experiments directed to the introduction and fostering of new agricultural industries, adapted to the various climates and soils of the State, especially the culture of truck and market gardens, the grape and other fruits;

Drainage and Irrigation; Fertilizer Sources. — With the investigations of the subject of drainage and irrigation and publication of information as to the best methods of both, and what surfaces, soils, and locations may be most benefited by such improvements; also with the collection and publication of information in regard to localities, character, accessibility, cost, and modes of utilization of native mineral and domestic sources of fertilizers, including formulae for composting adapted to the different crops, soils, and materials;

Farm Fences. — With the collection of statistics relating to the subject of farm fences, with suggestions for diminishing their cost, and the conditions under which they may be dispensed with altogether;

Sales of Fertilizers, Seeds, and Food Products. — With the enforcement and supervision of the laws which are or may be enacted in this State for the sale of commercial fertilizers, seeds and food products, with the authority to make regulations concerning the same;

Inducement of Capital and Immigration. — With the inducement of capital and immigration by the dissemination of information relative to the advantages of soil and climate and to the natural resources and industrial opportunities offered in this State, by the keeping of a land registry and by the publication of descriptions of agricultural, mineral, forest, and trucking lands which may be offered the Department for sale; which publication shall be in tabulated form, setting forth the county, township, number of acres, names and addresses of owners, and such other information as may be needful in placing inquiring homeseekers in communication with landowners; and he shall publish a list of such inquiries in the Bulletin for the benefit of those who may have land for sale;

Diversified Farming. — With such investigations as will best promote the improvement and extension of diversified farming, including the rotation of crops, the raising of home supplies, vegetables, fruits, stock, grasses, etc.;

Farmers’ Institutes. — With the holding of farmers’ institutes in the several counties of the State, as frequently as may be deemed advisable, in order to instruct the people in improved methods in farming, in the beneficial use of fertilizers and composts, and to ascertain the wants and necessities of the various farming communities; and may collect the papers and addresses made at these institutes and publish the same in pamphlet form annually for distribution among the farmers of the State. He may secure such assistants as may be necessary or beneficial in holding such institutes;

Publication of Bulletin. — The Commissioner shall publish bulletins which shall contain a list of the fertilizers and fertilizing materials registered for sale each year, the guaranteed constituents of each brand, reports of analyses of fertilizers, the dates of meeting and reports of farmers’ institutes and similar societies, description of farm buildings suited to our climate and needs, reports of interesting experiments of farmers, and such other matters as may be deemed advisable. The Department may determine the number of bulletins which shall be issued each year;

Reports to Legislature. — He shall transmit to the General Assembly at each session a report of the operations of the Department with suggestions of such legislation as may be deemed needful;

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 561, s. 116.

State Agricultural Policies. — Establish State government policies relating to agriculture.

Agronomic Testing. — Provide agronomic testing services and charge reasonable fees for plant analysis, nematode testing, in-State soil testing during peak season, out-of-state soil testing, and expedited soil testing. The Board shall charge at least four dollars ($4.00) for plant analysis, at least two dollars ($2.00) for nematode testing, at least four dollars ($4.00) for in-State soil testing during peak season, at least five dollars ($5.00) for out-of-state soil testing, and at least two hundred dollars ($200.00) for expedited soil testing. As used in this subdivision, “peak season” includes at a minimum the four-month period beginning no later than December 1 of any year and extending until at least March 31 of the following year. The Board may modify the meaning of peak season by starting a peak season earlier in any year or ending it later the following year or both.

Forests. — Have charge of forest maintenance, forest fire protection, reforestation, and the protection of the forests.

State forests. — Have charge of all State forests and measures for forest fire prevention.

Property for State forests. — Acquire real and personal property as desirable and necessary for the performance of the duties and functions of the Department under subdivision (19) of this section and pay for the property out of any funds appropriated for the Department or available unappropriated revenues of the Department, when such acquisition is approved by the Governor and Council of State. The title to any real estate acquired under this subdivision shall be in the name of the State of North Carolina for the use and benefit of the Department.

State recreational forests. — Have charge of all State recreational forests.

Property for State recreational forests. — Acquire real and personal property as desirable and necessary for the performance of the duties and functions of the Department under subdivision (21) of this section and pay for the property out of any funds appropriated for the Department or available unappropriated revenues of the Department, when such acquisition is approved by the Governor and Council of State. The title to any real estate acquired under this subdivision shall be in the name of the State of North Carolina for the use and benefit of the Department.

Administration of North Carolina Century Farms Program. — Administer the North Carolina Century Farms Program, which recognizes farms in the State that have been continuously owned by the same family for at least 100 years.

History.

1901, c. 479, s. 4; Rev., ss. 3294, 3724, 3944; 1917, c. 16; C.S., s. 4688; 1939, c. 173; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1979, c. 344, s. 1; 1981, c. 495, s. 9; 1989, c. 544, s. 4; 1993, c. 539, ss. 737, 738; c. 561, s. 116(d); 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2011-145, ss. 13.25(i), (l), 31.7; 2011-201, s. 1; 2011-391, s. 33(a); 2013-360, s. 13.1(a).

State Government Reorganization.

The State Museum of Natural Sciences was transferred to the Department of Agriculture by

G.S. 143A-66

, enacted by Session Laws 1971, c. 864. Section 143A-66 was repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 561, s. 116(c), effective August 1, 1993, and the museum was transferred to the Department of Environment, Health, and Natural Resources (now Department of Environmental Quality). In 2015, the State Museum of Natural Sciences was transferred to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(a).
See G.S. 143B-135.215 et seq. (recodified from former G.S. 143B-344.18 et seq.).

Transfer of Division of Soil and Water Conservation and Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(a) and (b), provides: “(a) The Division of Soil and Water Conservation is transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with all the elements of a Type I transfer, as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

.

“(b) All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission are transferred to and vested in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(a), provides: “(a) The Division of Forest Resources is transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with all the elements of a Type I transfer, as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(yy), provides: “The transfers under this section become effective July 1, 2011, and funds transferred shall be net of any changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(zz), provides: “Any references in this act to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.
Any references in this act to the Forestry Council of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Forestry Council of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25A(a)-(d), provides: “(a) Concurrently with the transfer under this act of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall transfer at least four vacant positions in the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to be reclassified by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for the central business office of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The Department of Environment and Natural Resources, the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Office of State Budget and Management, and the Office of State Personnel shall jointly determine if any additional positions from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources should be transferred to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services due to the transfer of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services under this section.

“(b) The Attorney General shall continue to provide legal counsel and legal support to the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation after these divisions are transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services under this act.

“(c) Subsequent to the transfer of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services under this act, the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation, including the staff and equipment of these two divisions, may continue to occupy the office space that these two divisions occupied prior to the transfer under this act, and the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall cooperate with this continued use of the office space.

“(d) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources and the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall enter into a memorandum of understanding concerning the sharing of existing databases and any software programs used in the administration of the programs of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation and any other matters addressed in this section in order to assure the uninterrupted continuation of services under these programs during and after the transfer of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services under this act.”

Session Law 2017-57, s. 10.24(a)-(h), as amended by Session Laws 2017-212, s. 4.4, and as amended by Session Laws 2020-18, s. 9(a), (b), provides: “(a)
There is created the North Carolina Food Innovation Lab Committee (Committee), which shall be located administratively in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The Committee shall consist of 14 members, including:

“(1) The Commissioner of Agriculture or the Commissioner’s designee, who will serve as chair.

“(2) The Secretary of Commerce or the Secretary’s designee.

“(3) The President of the Golden L.E.A.F. (Long-Term Economic Advancement Foundation), Inc., or the President’s designee.

“(4) Three members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at least one of whom shall be employed in the field of food manufacturing and at least one of whom shall be employed as a farmer or grower of crops.

“(5) Three members shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least one of whom shall be employed in the field of food manufacturing and at least one of whom shall be employed as a farmer or grower of crops.

“(6) The Dean of the College of Agriculture and Life Science at North Carolina State University, or the Dean’s designee.

“(7) The President of the Community Colleges System Office, or the President’s designee.

“(8) The President and CEO of Economic Development Partnership of North Carolina (EDPNC), or the President’s designee.

“(9) Agricultural Economist with expertise in food systems and agribusiness that could help in creation of a business plan for the initiative appointed upon the recommendation of the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“(10) One member who is a representative of the North Carolina Research Campus, who shall be a nonvoting member.

“(b) The Committee shall study and make recommendations to the General Assembly on measures that will serve the following goals:

“(1) Increasing the employment and private capital investment in food manufacturing in North Carolina, with an emphasis on rural and economically distressed areas.

“(2) Increasing the use of North Carolina produced ingredients, agricultural products, equipment, and other products of food manufacturers located in this State.

“(3) Increasing the number and economic value of food manufacturing entrepreneurs and companies in North Carolina, with priority given to those entities located in rural and economically distressed areas.

“(4) Any other goal the Committee deems advantageous to the State.

“(c) Appointments for all members shall be for terms of four years beginning within 30 days of when this act becomes law. Appointed members may be reappointed but shall not serve more than two consecutive terms of four years. Vacancies among appointed members shall be filled by the appointing entity and shall be for the remainder of the vacant term.

“No member of the General Assembly, spouse of a member of the General Assembly, or officer or employee of the State shall be eligible to serve on the Committee as an appointed member.

“The Committee shall meet at stated times established by the Committee but not less frequently than four times a year. Special meetings of the Committee may be set at any regular meeting or may be called by the chair. A majority of the appointed members of the Committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

“From funds available to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall allocate monies to fund the work of the Committee. Members of the Committee shall receive subsistence and travel expenses, as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

and

G.S. 138-5

.

“(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, the six Committee members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (4) and (5) of subsection (a) of this section shall serve a first term beginning on the date of their designation and ending on December 31, 2020. Thereafter, they shall serve four-year terms which shall begin on January 1, 2021.

“(e) The Committee shall develop a business plan for the Food Processing Research Center at the North Carolina Research Campus (Center) to implement. The business plan required by this subsection shall include processes for designing and marketing the Center. Of the funds appropriated in this act to North Carolina State University for the Center, the University shall allocate not more than the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2017-2018 fiscal year to the Committee to cover costs incurred by the Committee in developing a business plan required under this subsection. The business plan required under this subsection shall ensure all of the following:

“(1) The financial stability for the Center, including sources and uses for funds to operate the facility and maintain equipment for the Center.

“(2) The creation and implementation of revenue models that can be used to support the expenses of the facility with the goal of positioning the facility to ultimately cease to need State funds for continued operations.

“(3) The creation and implementation of policies that protect the State’s investment in the initiative and provide for a return to the taxpayers by increasing job opportunities, private sector investment, and increased markets for value-added agricultural products.

“(4) Any other provision the Committee deems necessary to carry out the intent and accomplish the goals established in this section.

“Upon completion of the business plan required under this subsection, the Committee shall submit the business plan to the University.

“(f) No less than 30 days prior to expending or encumbering any other funds provided in this act to the University for the Center, the University shall submit the business plan required under subsection (e) of this section to the Joint Legislative Commission on Government Operations. The business plan required under subsection (e) of this section is binding, and the University shall not deviate from the plan without having the plan amended by the Committee, which may adopt amendments by a majority vote.

“(g) On or before September 1, 2018, and at least semiannually thereafter, the Committee shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division with its activities, accomplishments, and recommendations based upon its study of the items listed in subsection (b) of this section.

“(h) This section expires January 1, 2021.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.’ ”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

§ 106-22.1.
State farms.

State-owned farmland, including timberland, allocated to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for the State Farm Program, shall be managed by the Department for research, teaching, and demonstration in agriculture, forestry, and aquaculture. Research projects on the State farms shall be approved by the Department. The Department may sell surplus commodities produced on the farms.

History.

1989, c. 500, s. 107(c); 1997-261, s. 23.

§ 106-22.2.

Recodified as § 143B-344.23 by Session Laws 1998-212, s. 21(a), effective July 1, 1998.

§ 106-22.3.
Organic Production Program.

The Board of Agriculture may establish rules, standards, guidelines, and policies for the establishment and implementation of a voluntary program for the certification of organically produced agricultural products.

The Commissioner of Agriculture may enter into agreements with the United States Department of Agriculture and may apply for approval, accreditation, certification, or similar authority as may be necessary to comply with the requirements of the Organic Foods Production Act of 1990, Public Law 101-624.

History.

1993, c. 147, s. 1.

§ 106-22.4.
Llamas as livestock.

Any rules adopted by the Board of Agriculture that affect llamas shall not refer to llamas as exotic or wild animals. It is the intent of the General Assembly that llamas be treated as domesticated livestock in order to promote the development and improvement of the llama industry in the State. This section does not prohibit the Board of Agriculture from classifying llamas for animal health purposes in accordance with generally accepted standards of veterinary medicine. For purposes of the section, “llama” means a South American camelid that is an animal of the genus llama. Llama includes llamas, alpacas, and guanacos. Llama does not include vicunas.

History.

1997-84, s. 3.

§ 106-22.5.
Agricultural tourism signs.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall work with the Department of Transportation to provide directional signs on major highways at or in reasonable proximity to the nearest interchange leading to an agricultural facility that promotes tourism by providing tours and on-site sales or samples of North Carolina agricultural products to area tourists. The Department shall follow the sign location and placement rules of the Department of Transportation’s Tourist-Oriented Directional Signs and Logo Signs programs.

An agricultural facility must be open for business at least four days a week, 10 months of the year in order to qualify for the directional signs provided for in this section. The Department shall assess the facility the actual reasonable costs of the sign and its installation.

History.

1999-356, s. 1; 2014-58, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-58, s. 2, effective July 7, 2014, in subsection (a), inserted “work with the Department of Transportation to” and deleted “or within one mile” following “nearest interchange” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

§ 106-22.6.
Exercise of enforcement powers.

When any board, commission, or official within the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services has the authority to assess civil penalties, such authority shall not be construed to require the issuance of a monetary penalty when the board, commission, or official determines that nonmonetary sanctions, education, or training are sufficient to address the underlying violation.

History.

2013-265, s. 5.

§ 106-22.7.
New and emerging crops program.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is authorized to create a program to advance and promote new and emerging crops. If the Department creates a new and emerging crops program, the Department shall merge its research initiative in bioenergy research into the program.

History.

2018-5, s. 12.5(a).